California, session 20252026, AB247.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2714 is added to the Penal Code, to read:2714. In addition to the credits received pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2933.3, incarcerated individual hand crew members shall be paid an hourly wage equal to seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) while assigned to an active fire incident. The wage rate shall be reviewed annually.SEC. 2. Section 4019.2 of the Penal Code is amended to read:4019.2. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, any inmate sentenced to county jail assigned to a conservation camp by a sheriff and who is eligible to earn one day of credit for every one day of incarceration pursuant to Section 4019 shall instead earn two days of credit for every one day of service.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any inmate who has completed training for assignment to a conservation camp or to a state or county facility as an inmate firefighter or who is assigned to a county or state correctional institution as an inmate firefighter and who is eligible to earn one day of credit for every one day of incarceration pursuant to Section 4019 shall instead earn two days of credit for every one day served in that assignment or after completing that training.(c) (1) In addition to the credits received pursuant to subdivision (b), incarcerated individual hand crew members shall be paid an hourly wage equal to seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) while assigned to an active fire incident. The wage rate shall be reviewed annually.(2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall maintain regulations regarding an administrative adjudication and remedy process for any dispute over sums owed pursuant to this section for incarcerated individual hand crew members assigned to a state conservation camp, facility, or institution.(3) A county shall maintain regulations regarding an administrative adjudication and remedy process for any disputes over sums owed pursuant to this section for incarcerated individual hand crew members assigned to that county’s conservation camp, facility, or institution.(d) In addition to credits granted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), inmates who have successfully completed training for firefighter assignments shall receive a credit reduction from their term of confinement.(e) The credits authorized in subdivisions (b) and (d) shall only apply to inmates who are eligible after October 1, 2011.SEC. 3. Section 1760.46 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:1760.46. (a) A ward or youth hand crew member placed at the Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp pursuant to Section 730, Section 875, or Section 1760.45 shall be paid an hourly wage equal to seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) while assigned to an active fire incident. The wage rate shall be reviewed annually.(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall maintain regulations regarding an administrative adjudication and remedy process for any disputes over sums owed pursuant to this section.SEC. 4. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:To ensure that resources are ready and available to combat California’s wildfires, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.